Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.17
In this state or within the state, defined.

In this state or within the state means within the exterior limits of the State of Nebraska and includes all the territory within these limits owned by or ceded to the United States of America.

Laws 1992, LB 871, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 77-2702.08;

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 21.